Tennessee, session 114, SB1616.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 7-51-201, is amended by deleting
from subdivision (d)(4) the language "As used in this subsection (d)" and substituting "As used
in this section"; and by deleting subdivision (d)(4)(B) and substituting:
(B) "Firefighter" means a full-time, paid employee of a fire department of this
state or a political subdivision of this state, including an arson investigator who is
employed by the Tennessee bureau of investigation or is a sworn deputy of a county
sheriff's department.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1616
009669
- 1 -